New York, session 2025-2026, A3057.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (jj) of section 1115 of the tax law, as added 2 by section 1 of part SS of chapter 59 of the laws of 2015, is REPEALED. 3 § 2. Subdivision 13 of section 1118 of the tax law, as added by 4 section 2 of part SS of chapter 59 of the laws of 2015, is REPEALED. 5 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 6 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to 7 taxable years beginning on or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03124-03-6